Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Conservation and Recreation  Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Oregon  Con-
servation and Recreation Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the State  Department of Fish
and Wildlife to carry out activities that serve to protect, maintain or enhance fish and
wildlife resources in  Oregon. The activities for which the department may expend fund
moneys include, but are not limited to:
(a) Promoting the health of Oregon’s ecosystems and fish and  wildlife species by imple-
menting conservation programs and strategies  identified in the Oregon Conservation Strat-
egy, as  defined in ORS 541.890, including conservation programs and strategies for the
nearshore identified in the marine component of the Oregon Conservation Strategy;
(b) Improving engagement  of the public in hunting and fishing opportunities and in other
outdoor recreation opportunities  related to and in support of healthy fish, wildlife and
habitats;
(c) Improving educational outreach and engagement of the public, including  diverse and
underserved communities, related to and in support of healthy fish, wildlife and habitats;
(d) Engaging in, and providing funding for, joint projects of the  department and the State
Parks and Recreation Department or other state agencies  as recommended by the Oregon
Conservation and Recreation Advisory Committee established under section 2 of this 2019
Act; and
(e) Other  conservation, management, research, habitat improvement, enforcement, out-
door recreation or education activities.
(3) The fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife for deposit in the
fund or otherwise transferred to the fund; and
(b) Gifts, grants, contributions or other donations for use as described in  subsection (2)
of this section, that are  received by the department from any public or private source and
caused to be deposited and credited to the fund.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon Conservation and Recreation Advisory  Committee is estab-
lished as an advisory committee to the State Fish and Wildlife Commission and  the State
Department of Fish and Wildlife for  the purpose of carrying out the duties described in
subsection (2) of this  section. The commission shall determine the number of members of the
committee and the geographical representation by the  members. The Governor shall appoint
the members of the committee.
(2) The committee shall review department policies regarding the use of  Oregon Conser-
vation and Recreation Fund moneys  and make recommendations to the commission and the
department regarding the use of fund moneys for implementing and administering  depart-
ment activities.
(3) Members of the committee  may not receive compensation for service as members.
However, subject to any applicable law regulating travel and other  expenses of state officers
Enrolled House Bill 2829 (HB 2829-A) Page 2
and employees, a member may  be reimbursed for actual and necessary travel and other ex-
penses incurred in the performance of official  duties from moneys available to the depart-
ment for the purpose of reimbursement of committee members.
(4) The department and the committee jointly shall submit  a biennial report to the Leg-
islative Assembly as provided in ORS 293.640  regarding the expenditure of moneys deposited
in the Oregon Conservation and Recreation Fund established under section 1 of this 2019  Act
and on the status of various activities funded by the moneys.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $1,000,000, to be allocated to the State Department of Fish  and Wildlife
for the purposes of the  Oregon Conservation and Recreation Fund. However, the board may
not release the appropriation unless the department has  deposited into the Oregon Conser-
vation and Recreation Fund at least $1,000,000 received from sources  other than state gov-
ernment, as defined in ORS 174.111, or the federal government.
SECTION 4. (1) The Oregon Conservation  and Recreation Fund established under section
1 of this 2019 Act is abolished.
(2) Any moneys remaining in the fund on the operative date  specified in section 5 of this
2019 Act that  are unexpended, unobligated and not subject to any conditions shall be trans-
ferred to the General Fund.
SECTION 5. Section 4 of this 2019 Act becomes operative July 1, 2021.
SECTION 6. Sections 1 and 2 of this 2019 Act are repealed on January 2, 2022.
SECTION 7. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Passed by House June 12, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 19, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2829 (HB 2829-A) Page 3